test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bunnde_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bunnde: # N_EVEN (with final -e in nom.sg)
    bunnde+N+Sg+Nom: bunnde
    bunnde+N+Sg+Gen: bunde
    bunnde+N+Sg+Acc: bundev
    bunnde+N+Sg+Ill: bunndáj
    bunnde+N+Sg+Ine: bunden
    bunnde+N+Sg+Ela: [bundest, bundes]
    bunnde+N+Sg+Com: [bundijn, bundijna]
    bunnde+N+Pl+Nom: bunde
    bunnde+N+Pl+Gen: bundij
    bunnde+N+Pl+Acc: bundijd
    bunnde+N+Pl+Ill: bundijda
    bunnde+N+Pl+Ine: bundijn
    bunnde+N+Pl+Ela: [bundijst, bundijs]
    bunnde+N+Pl+Com: [bundij, bundijgum]
    bunnde+N+Ess: bunnden
    bunnde+N+Abe: bundedak
